Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.110

Election on question of incorporation—Ballots.

The ballots in the initial election on the question of incorporation shall contain the words "for incorporation" and "against incorporation" or words equivalent thereto.

[ 1986 c 234 s 14; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.110. Prior: 1957 c 173 s 10; prior: 1890 p 131 s 2, part; 1888 p 221 ss 1, 2, part; 1877 p 173 ss 1, 2, part; 1871 p 51 s 1, part; RRS s 8884, part.]